Washington statutes.
RCW 24.55.900

Effective date—2009 c 436.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 11, 2009].

[ 2009 c 436 s 14.]